Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2446.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 28, chapter 14, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 28-5233, to read: START_STATUTE28-5233. Motor carriers; English proficiency required; inspections; definition A. a motor carrier in this state shall demonstrate English proficiency. English proficiency includes a motor carrier's ability to understand and respond to verbal questions and to understand highway traffic signs, including ELECTRONIC dynamic message signs. A specialty officer of the department or a law enforcement officer authorized pursuant to section 28-5204 shall issue an out-of-service order to a motor carrier who cannot sufficiently demonstrate English proficiency during an inspection. B. All roadside inspections shall be conducted in English and without tools to facilitate communication, including interpreters, cue cards, smartphone applications or on-call telephone interpretation services. C. If a motor carrier is deemed proficient in English by a specialty officer of the department or a law enforcement officer authorized pursuant to section 28-5204, the remainder of the inspection may be conducted using the communication methods and techniques best suited to facilitate the safe and effective completion of the inspection. D. For the purposes of this section, "out-of-service order" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-5241.END_STATUTE